District of Columbia statutes.
7-1541.01

Statement of policy and purpose.

Because of the rapid medical progress in the field of tissue preservation, tissue transplantation, and tissue culture, and because it is in the public interest to aid the development of this field of medicine, it is the policy and purpose of Congress in enacting this subchapter and the amendments to §§ 43-119 and 43-125 to encourage and aid the development of reconstructive medicine and surgery and the development of medico-surgical research by providing for the licensing and regulation of tissue banks, and by facilitating antemortem and postmortem authorizations for donations of tissue.

History

Sept. 10, 1962, 76 Stat. 534, Pub. L. 87-656, § 2

Section References

This section is referenced in § 7-1531.01 and § 43-125.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1601.
1973 Ed., § 2-251.